North Dakota, session 69, HB1273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Prohibition on limitation of free speech.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state or a political subdivision may not adopt
or implement a policy, order, or ordinance that limits or prohibits speech of an individual,
including hate crime ordinances. This section may not be superseded or modified by a city or
county home rule charter or ordinance. A policy, order, or ordinance that violates this section is
void.
Page No. 1 25.0223.03000